Illinois, session 104th, SB2688.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Agriculture Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 6205-455 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 205/205-455 new)8    Sec. 205-455. Online portal.9    (a) In this Section:10    "Farmland" has the meaning ascribed to that term in the 11last Census of Agriculture published by the National 12Agricultural Statistics Service of the United States 13Department of Agriculture.14    "User" means:15        (1) a rural community;16        (2) a farmer;17        (3) an agribusiness; or18        (4) any other individual or entity using the online 19    portal established under this Section for the purposes 20    described in subsection (d).21    (b) The Department shall establish an online portal on the 22Department's website.23    (c) The Department shall administer the online portal.  SB2688- 2 -LRB104 14627 BDA 27769 b1    (d) The purposes of the online portal shall be to:2        (1) assist users in the successful navigation of 3    agricultural or related topics among various federal and 4    State agencies;5        (2) provide a single online source for users to access 6    agricultural or related federal and State funding 7    opportunities;8        (3) provide a searchable database of available federal 9    and State grants with information on deadlines and 10    eligibility criteria; and11        (4) provide regular updates to reflect changes in 12    federal and State funding opportunities.13    (e) The online portal shall include links that will 14facilitate navigating the Department's website and the 15websites of various other State and federal agencies, 16including the following:17        (1) the United States Department of Agriculture;18        (2) the United States Department of Agriculture's 19    Natural Resources Conservation Service;20        (3) the United States Environmental Protection Agency;21        (4) the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency; and22        (5) any other federal or State agency, the interaction 23    with which would be helpful to users, as determined by the 24    Department.25    (f) To accomplish the purposes described in subsection 26(d), the online portal shall do all the following:  SB2688- 3 -LRB104 14627 BDA 27769 b1        (1) provide a series of regulatory checklists for 2    users that are considering diversifying into new markets 3    to assist users in:4            (A) navigating agricultural and related 5        regulations; and6            (B) avoiding punitive enforcement actions before 7        they arise;8        (2) assist users in collaborating with:9            (A) the University of Illinois Extension Office;10            (B) the Prairie Research Institute at the 11        University of Illinois; and12            (C) the United States Department of Agriculture;13        (3) create an online portal that will help connect 14    users with responsive data visualization tools and 15    technical assistance programming; and16        (4) provide an online portal through which users may 17    gather information regarding, and apply for, available 18    federal and State agricultural and related funding 19    opportunities.20    (h) By November 1 of each year in which the National 21Agricultural Statistics Service of the United States 22Department of Agriculture publishes its Census of Agriculture, 23the Department shall:24        (1) conduct an inventory of all farmland lost in 25    Illinois during the 5 calendar years preceding publication 26    of the report; and  SB2688- 4 -LRB104 14627 BDA 27769 b1        (2) identify the primary cause of the reduction of 2    farmland under paragraph (1).3    (i) After conducting each inventory under subsection (h), 4the Department shall report its findings and recommendations, 5including any recommended legislation, to the General Assembly 6in accordance with Section 3.1 of the General Assembly 7Organization Act on or before December 31 of the year in which 8the inventory is conducted. Within 30 days after filing with 9the General Assembly the report required under this 10subsection, the Department shall upload the report to its 11website.